District of Columbia statutes.
29-1002.03

Liability for inaccurate information in filed record.

If a record delivered to the Mayor for filing under this chapter and filed by the Mayor contains inaccurate information, a person that suffers a loss by reliance on the information may recover damages for the loss from a person that signed the record or caused another to sign it on the person’s behalf and knew at the time the record was signed that the information was inaccurate.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 205 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.